Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1570
Scald prevention device; inspection.

Persons employed by political subdivisions to inspect plumbing fixtures shall inspect showers and bathtubs for compliance with section 71-1569.

Laws 1987, LB 264, § 2.